Washington statutes.
RCW 43.46.095

State art collection.

All works of art purchased and commissioned under the visual arts program shall become a part of a state art collection developed, administered, and operated by the Washington state arts commission. All works of art previously purchased or commissioned under RCW 43.46.090, 43.17.200, 43.19.455, 28B.10.025, or 28A.335.210 shall be considered a part of the state art collection to be administered by the Washington state arts commission.

[ 1990 c 33 s 578; 1983 c 204 s 2.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Severability—1983 c 204: See note following RCW 43.46.090.